Hawaii statutes.
§291-51.3 Reimbursement to counties;
agreement with counties to provide permits. The State shall reimburse the
counties for the unit cost of providing a removable windshield placard or a
temporary removable windshield placard on behalf of the State. The
reimbursement rate paid to the counties for providing removable windshield
placards, temporary removable windshield placards, special license plates, and
identification cards shall be established pursuant to section 291-56; provided
that a county may retain any fees charged for a transaction. [L 2006, c 269, §1;
am L 2007, c 77, §1; am L 2010, c 141, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next